sv: Upptäckta faror: Kolmonoxid (CO); Värme; LPG; Metan; Naturgas; Propan; Rökig; Rök och kolmonoxid; Övrigt
da: Registrerede farer: Kulilte (CO); Varme; LPG; Metan; Naturgas; Propan; Røg; Røg og kulilte; Andet
sl-SI: Zaznane nevarnosti: Ogljikov monoksid (CO); Heat; LPG; Metan; Zemeljski plin; Propan; Dimno; Dim in ogljikov monoksid; Druga
ko: 감지 위험 요소: 일산화탄소(CO); 열감; LPG; 메테인; 천연가스; 프로페인; 연기; 연기/일산화탄소; 기타
ru: Обнаруживаемые опасности: Угарный газ (CO); Тепло; СУГ; Метан; Природный газ; Пропан; Дым; Дым и угарный газ; Другое
pl: Wykryto zagrożenia: Tlenek węgla (CO); Ciepło; LPG; Metan; Gaz ziemny; Propan; Dym; Dym i tlenek węgla; Pozostałe
it: Pericoli rilevati: Monossido di carbonio (CO); Calore; LPG; Metano; Gas naturale; Propano; Smoke; Fumo e monossido di carbonio; Altro
es: Peligros detectados: Monóxido de carbono; Calor; LPG; Metano; Gas natural; Propano; Humo; Humo y monóxido de carbono; Otros
sk-SK: Zistené nebezpečenstvá: Oxid uhoľnatý (CO); Teplo; LPG; Metán; Zemný plyn; Propán; Dym; Dym a oxid uhoľnatý; Iné
fi: Havaitut vaarat: Hiilimonoksidi (CO); Lämpö; LPG; Metaani; Luonnonkaasu; Propaani; Savu; Savu ja häkä; Muu
hr-HR: Otkrivene opasnosti: Ugljični monoksid (CO); Heat; LPG; Metan; Prirodni plin; Propan; Dim; Dim i ugljični monoksid; Ostalo
tr: Tespit edilen tehlikeler: Karbon monoksit (CO); Isı; LPG; Metan; Doğal gaz; Propan; Duman; Duman ve karbonmonoksit; Diğer
ro-RO: Pericole detectate: Monoxid de carbon (CO); Căldură; LPG; Metan; Gaz natural; Propan; Fum; Fum și monoxidul de carbon; Altele
fr: Dangers détectés: Monoxyde de carbone (CO); Chaleur; GPL; Méthane; Gaz naturel; Propane; Fumée; Fumée et monoxyde de carbone; Autre
nb: Oppdagede farer: Karbonmonoksid (CO); Varme; LPG; Metan; Naturgass; Propan; Røykfarget; Røyk og karbonmonoksid; Annet
cs: Detekovatelná nebezpečí: Oxid uhelnatý (CO); Vysoká teplota; LPG; Metan; Zemní plyn; Propan; Kouř; Kouř a oxid uhelnatý; Jiný
pt-BR: Perigos detectados: Monóxido de carbono (CO); Calor; GLP; Metano; Gás natural; Propano; Esfumaçado; Fumaça e monóxido de carbono; Outro
de: Erkannte Gefahren: Kohlenmonoxid (CO); Hitze; LPG; Methan; Erdgas; Propan; Rauchig; Rauch und Kohlenmonoxid; Sonstiges
th: อันตรายที่ตรวจพบได้: คาร์บอนมอนออกไซด์ (CO); ความร้อน; LPG; มีเทน; แก๊สธรรมชาติ; โพรเพน; ควัน; ควันและก๊าซคาร์บอนมอนอกไซด์; อื่นๆ
en: Hazards detected: Carbon monoxide (CO); Heat; LPG; Methane; Natural gas; Propane; Smoke; Smoke and carbon monoxide; Other
bg-BG: Открити опасности: Въглероден оксид (CO); Топлина; LPG; Метан; Природен газ; Пропан; Дим; Дим и въглероден оксид; Друго
vi: Các mối nguy hiểm được phát hiện: Carbon monoxide (CO); Nhiệt; LPG; Methane; Khí tự nhiên; Propan; Khói; Khói và khí carbon monoxide; Khác
pt-PT: Perigos detetados: Monóxido de carbono (CO); Calor; LPG; Metano; Gás natural; Propano; Fumo; Fumo e monóxido de carbono; Outro
zh-CN: 检测到的危险: 一氧化碳 (CO); 热量; LPG; 甲烷; 天然气; 丙烷; 烟雾; 烟雾和一氧化碳; 其他
ja: 危険の検出: 一酸化炭素 (CO); 熱; LPG; メタン; 天然ガス; プロパン; スモーク; 煙と一酸化炭素; その他
hu: Észlelt veszélyek: Szén-monoxid (CO); Hő; LPG; Metán; Földgáz; Propán; Füst; Füst és szén-monoxid; Egyéb
zh-TW: 偵測危害: 一氧化碳 (CO); 高溫; 液化石油氣; 甲烷; 天然氣; 丙烷; 煙霧; 煙霧和一氧化碳; 其他
lt-LT: Aptikti pavojai: Anglies monoksidas (CO); Karštis; LPG; Metanas; Gamtinės dujos; Propanas; Tamsintas; Dūmai ir anglies monoksidas; Kita
nl: Gedetecteerde gevaren: Koolmonoxide (CO); Hitte; LPG; Methaan; Aardgas; Propaan; Rook; Rook en koolmonoxide; Overig
el: Ανιχνευόμενοι κίνδυνοι: Μονοξείδιο του άνθρακα (CO); Θερμότητα; LPG; Μεθάνιο; Φυσικό αέριο; Προπάνιο; Καπνός; Καπνός και μονοξείδιο του άνθρακα; Άλλο